Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-903
Solar energy, defined.

Solar energy shall mean radiant energy, direct, diffuse, or reflected, received from the sun at wavelengths suitable for conversion into thermal, chemical, or electrical energy.

Laws 1979, LB 353, § 3.